Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,204
Certificate of licensure; required;
violation; injunction.

No person shall practice as a professional
landscape architect or in any manner designate himself or herself as a professional landscape architect unless he or she has been issued a certificate
of licensure pursuant to the Professional Landscape Architects
Act. If such person does practice or attempt to practice under
the designation of professional landscape
architect, he or she may
be restrained under permanent injunction.

Laws 1967, c. 565, § 21, p. 1866;

Laws 1971, LB 98, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB1140, § 22.